Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2014.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7(d)(3) of the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act, is amended AND THE SUBSECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH to read:Section 7. Minors serving in volunteer emergency service organizations.* * *(d) Other provisions.--* * *(3) An individual who is 14 or 15 years of age may engage in training or [firefighting activities permitted under this section until 10 p.m. before a school day] other <--12345678910111213141516171819 activities permitted under subsection (b)(1) until 10 p.m. if the minor:(i) is a member of a volunteer fire company; and(ii) has the written consent of the minor's parent or legal guardian.(4) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AT LEAST 14 YEARS OF AGE MAY RIDE AN OFFICIAL VEHICLE TO THE SCENE OF A FIRE OR OTHER EMERGENCY RESPONSE FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENGAGING IN ACTIVITIES AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION IF TRANSPORTATION OF THE MINOR COMPLIES WITH FEDERAL REGULATIONS FOR THE TRANSPORTATION OF MINORS ENGAGED IN EMPLOYMENT.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2014PN3557 - 2 - <--123456789101112